Utah statutes.
35A-7-107.   Use and access to the registry records.

(1) (a)  The records of the registry shall be maintained as private records under Section 63G-2-202.

(b)  In addition to those persons granted access to private records under Sections 63G-2-202 and 63G-2-206, state or federal agencies may access data from the registry for the following purposes:

(i)  the Office of Recovery Services for use related to locating, establishing, and enforcing child, medical, and spousal support obligations and other services;

(ii)  state agencies which use financial information in determining eligibility for public assistance programs; and

(iii)  federal agencies responsible for periodic matches of new hire registry information with federal data bases.

(2)  Information that is received under this chapter shall be kept by the department for at least six months.

